DO NOT GO HERE FOR INVISALIGN. Yes, it's cheaper than any other place. Yes, the test of the dental school is super awesome and professional and prompt. Go here for extractions or emergencies or root canals etc. but trust me, you don't want to mess with orthodontics. It seemed great at first--prompt appointment, thorough evaluation, collaborative treatment plan... So I put down the requisite deposit for my invisalign. They said come back in a month to get started. They canceled that appointment three days before it was scheduled with a vague voicemail saying they had construction and to call back in two months. Whatever. Cool. Fast forward two months, and they are booked solid for another two months and ask why I didn't schedule something earlier. When told that I tried and they never pick up the phone, they had no response. Whatever. Scheduled for 2.5 months later. Fast forward again, the appointment I waited 4.5 months for arrived, and I was ready to go. But nope. Orthodontist said he didn't order the trays yet because he wanted me to approve the plan first (valid). I approved the plan, he said he'll call and schedule me in sometime no later than the following week. Week passes--crickets. I think okay I'll give it a second week. More crickets. I call--no answer. I call 25 more times, no answer. Left a voicemail--no call back. Called 35 more times over the next two weeks, at all various times between 9-5. No answer. Left voicemail. They called back and I'm pretty sure hung up after one ring before i could grab it, because I hit answer immediately but they were gone. No voicemail. I called back immediately, someone picked up and hung up on me. I called back again-no answer. Left another desperate-slash-angry voicemail. As yet no response. My teeth are still crooked. My wallet is empty. My phone is nearly dead from calling repeatedly, and my faith in NYU Dental is entirely diminished. Do yourself a favor, pay a little extra and go someplace that won't put you through this.UPDATE: I just showed up, walked in, managed to get paired with an orthodontist and ever since then my invisalign has gone without a hitch, and I've had great care. I do not understand why they make scheduling such an impossible mess....but I guess you just have to walk-in to get any kind of service? Strange, and disorganized, but once you're in you're all set.

I went to NYU Dental -and I regret it. After going to the emergency clinic on a Saturday, because I had pain in a tooth, I was told I needed a root canal. That's fine. I was given an appointment for the regular school practice. I saw a student dentist. Supported by a faculty dentist, I was told I needed cleaning first and a set of x-rays. Then I was told that I had several regular cavities, and it would be better for me to have these repaired right away. Somehow, it seems to me, the root canal got lost. Apparently student dentists have to go perform certain procedures to graduate so, for example, if they see you have a front tooth that needs drilling, they may have a reason to go forward with that procedure before anything else. In any case, it was six months, and two student-dentists later, before I went to the next phase of the root canal. Then I was told that the tooth could not be saved. And so they started me on another course of treatment, and many visits, for an implant. All this time, the costs were going up, too. And at each stage they required multiple x-rays -several full sets, I think, plus two different specialty x-ray machines that take rotating views. Each time i was told that the radiation 'was less than you get when you take an airplane.' (Isn't that different radiation? -it's not all the same!) It seems to me that I had innumerable x-rays taken.There's more to say here. But the point is that the clinic is inefficient and is more concerned with teaching their students -and being so 'thorough' that the problem takes forever to get addressed. And it seems to me that, when all is done, it's no cheaper for these procedures at NYU than a private dentist.

It is now January 2017, and the NYU Tote Board for hubby: $65,000+ with no end in sight...Five years along. Anyway, Ric's most recently installed dental appliances and implants now have the pesky habit of popping out. This morning, after scrambled eggs and fruit. And when he shows up on Monday to have them reattached, as he has done before..the Dr. usually will say, "Oh, I can't see you now, come back at three p.m." WTF? The guy has our phone numbers, and our e.mails. for months. I guess medical competence, financial transparency and integrity are Hippocratic non essentials, as NYU trains its new generation (G*d help us all) of dentists. Then, unleashes them on an unsuspecting public. We've heard of Doctors Without Borders. Now, it seems we have Dentists Without Morals!!!

AVOID. super unprofessional. Callen Lorde dental sent me here, and I had a very abrupt first appointment that took 2 weeks to get.The next appointment they had to call me to schedule. Guess how long they made me wait? 2 months for a phone call to schedule an appointment. What were they doing all that time??Then at the end of the call the receptionist slips in a number #105. and keeps on going. I'm like, hold up, what's the 105 number. a service code?She's like no, that's how much your next visit will cost. I say - what about my insurance. Nope, in depth visits are not covered.WTF. 2.5 months total waiting for treatment only to be popped with surprise charges. If they make you this long, and tell you that little information, guess what them treating your mouth is going to be like - on top of them using practicing students.NO NO NO. run like fire. heed the red flags.

So, my insurance company said I can go here for a cleaning.I called to make an appt. Besides the oddest availability, I can't even get my cleaning till my 3rd visit! 1st visit: exam and xrays2nd visit: treatment plan (it's a cleaning, what treatment plan?!!!)3rd visit: cleaningBasically they want guinea pigs for their students, while I pay for 3 visits and waste my time.

Wow, I feel blessed to have crossed paths with my current dentist she, rocks!!!!Being a single parent and having gross medical insurance placed me in the path of disgusting devious incompent a holes they should have their licenses revoked, I came to NYU and i encountered this amazing kind, intelligent , and ultra bright women by the name is Cherese.   I was treatd with exceptional care and respect, the Dentist that are present on the floor are wonderful also i like to give a shout out. Cherese, thank you for being amazing and going above and beyond the call of duty and taking care of my choppers!!!!Valentina

I'd love to give this ZERO stars. They have the RUDEST receptionist alive. I am not sure how she can be employed anyplace. They schedule appts then cancel the week before your appt. saying "the clinic will be closed" (you would think they would have that in the schedule BEFORE you get given an appt)no one picks up the phone when you try to return their call.

My mother had an appointment at 10:30 today she did not leave until 4:30. This place is unorganized and unprofessional. The worse experience ever. I would not recommend this place to anyone. It's not even worth the savings. My mom had such an awful experience. I wish I could give them a zero.

Having had horrible experiences here several years ago, I tried to get my dental work done at Columbia Dental way uptown, and found that Columbia is a similar hit-or-miss experience to having dental work done at NYU, but with worse hours--no weekend or evening clinics--and an epic 3-train trip to get up there from the Lower East Side.So I returned here after well over ten years away, to find that they've remodeled the interiors of the building. I also had the great good fortune of being assigned to a student who has previously been a practicing dentist in India, and only needs her certification from NYU to practice in this country.So I've had excellent care; it's the luck of the draw. As far as the administration goes, they still suck; it's been incredibly difficult to get through the switchboard, and often I'm transferred right to voicemail when I call a specific department. However, if my crappy teeth can be saved, I'll upgrade to 5 stars.

the worst of the worst place for dentistry. you are nothing but a guinea pig to the dental students and the sorry excuses for supervisors. extremely unprofessional. horrible work. i urge everyone never to go there unless botched up dentistry is your thing.

All I can say is no! NO! NO! NO! This place is a scam and the faculty should be barred from practice. I had a lot of work done here, most of which had to get redone and redone again at the school. I spent a total of 6 months having my mouth poked full of needles once every week and a half, and having the same teeth drilled and redrilled on time and time again. They left a wooden wedge between two teeth that was very painful and when I complained about it the student and professor said they didn't see anything wrong and I didn't have a valid complaint. It came out 2 weeks later on it's own. I feel like I am not giving the horror of this experience justice, but I must continue. I first tried to leave and go see a private practice about 3 months in, and the professor told me that the teeth they had to work on were just very difficult for any dentist and my experience would hardly be any better at the best dentist. So I continued. The final straw was when they were working on a crown. They had to take moldings of the area they prepared 3 different times. This means I had a total of 4 2 hour sessions that had to occur on different days for this crown. And then when I was waiting to hear about the crown arriving (after the 3rd impression) they told me that I had to come in for more impressions because the ones they took were no good. I couldn't take it anymore. The constant poking of needles. The days off work I was takining to come in. I simply couldn't afford it anymore. So I switched to a private practice. The dental schools said they were sorry and that they would wipe the cost of the crown from my balance and if I recieved any further bills to ignore it because it was just because it was a process to wipe it from the system. Well first let's talk about the private practice. immediately they found decay under 2 of the fillings that were done at nyu, plus another two areas of decay missed by the professors and students. In addition the tooth nyu had been preparing for the undelivered crown was nowhere near ready for moldings to be taken, and needed to be filed down more to even begin the molding process. It took me a total of 3 visits, including 1 x-ray only visit, to get all this work done with the private practice. Now, flash forward 1 1/2 months since I left NYU. Well, first they sent me a bill for the crown, which was supposed to be wiped back in August, but I was told to ignore that bill because it would be wiped. Now I just recieved a bill for the exact same cost of the crown, only the costs had been itemized to say they were all these different fillings. Mind you I paid off all the work that was done there already except for the charge of the crown that was to be wiped. So not only did they do a horrendously shitty and fucked up job which involved high levels of negligence on the part of the faculty, they were also serving me with fraudulent charges. I call bullshit on this school and all the faculty there. They should be ashamed of themselves and be sued for malpractice. I might have to. We will find out shortly. Seriously fuck this place.

Went in for a treatment plan for receding gums. I was given 15 individual X-rays and a mouth exam that was excruciating. I asked for a simple local with Novocain and it was denied. By the time they were done, I felt like I was punched in the jaw. A week later my mouth is in pain and I have an infection where they were scraping. The roof of my mouth was nicked.

A friend introduced me to this dentistry school, but after reading a few mixed reviews I was skeptical.     My first experience was quite pleasant. I went there for a loose tooth ache. I ended up having to do an emergency extraction. In addition, I was told by the faculty that I may need periodontal treatment. So I signed up for all the treatments they recommended. This is basically a hit or miss. I've seen more then 5 student dentists so far. Some were very bad and some were very good. I finally ended up assigned to Dr. Chandani Patel. And luckily so, as she was very attentive and caring from the getgo. Always ready to answer all my concerns, she was very detailed in everything. Which made me very comfortable and make me lost my frear of dentist visits.I need periodontal treatment, orthodontist (fix my teeth gap) and three implants. Dr. Chandani is now working on all of those problems, including deep cleaning. However, I was referred to another doctor for my periodontal work. That was a huge disappointment. He was upset they I showed up for my appointment 20 min early. He told me he had busy day and was tired. With just checking my previous x-ray, he reschedule to see me 4 months later. I told him I wanted to get my teeth gap fixed soon, but in order to do so, I need to get a pass from periodontal, to which he replied "ok, if you want, I'll give you a pass". Not the answer I way hoping for. I wanted to have my gum disease taken care of so I can get a real pass, one the problem was truly fixed.The good news is you could request for another doctor. And that's what I plan to do. So, as of now, I'm back in the capable hands of Dr. Chandani. Looking forward to getting all my dental issues addressed. I highly recommend this school. Apart of a few bad apples, all the staff and the faculty is very friendly.

Great first experience. Just a general exam and x-rays, but my dentist Lila was extremely friendly and accommodating. My wait time was very short, and all students and staff on hand were very friendly. Feeling comfortable going and getting some actual work done there next time.

Run away from this place like your hair is on fire!!!The practice uses students getting ready to graduate from dental school to do the work without sufficient supervision from faculty. These students are on par with toddlers, professionally speaking, with seemingly no meaningful practical experience other than this clinic. I was radiated 5x for partial X-rays of my uppers because the student radiology technician had no clue how to do the job and no one was monitoring what she was doing. When I look back on this part of the experience, I ultimately blame myself for letting her do this and not speaking up. Hindsight is 20/20. Additionally, the supervising faculty dentist signed off on the development of a treatment plan that limited the scope of the X-rays to only 4 teeth on each side. This is also indicative of the lack of care and professionalism I ask you, from your experience, have you ever gone to a dentist that limited X-rays of your mouth in this way when you were seeking a full evaluation ?????? I went there for a routine checkup in order to set up a long-term plan for treatment of all my teeth, and was there on a non-urgent basis.  In my view, the treatment I received was analogous to getting a routine mammogram that consists of one partial view of one breast. Not exactly adequate as a comprehensive screening tool.The place was unkempt and looked seedy, with no advanced medical equipment that I could discern. With all the money NYU takes in, you'd think they'd invest in an updated, modern facility.

The most terrible experience I had!!!!!!!! Don't Go There!!! There are lists of things I need to say!! 1. Here caused my failure of the surgery! The person who did my implant named Kafaia and doctor Tilip from the second floor. 2. The staff there are racists and look down there patient whoever are low income. The faculty on the 7th floor pulled my hair(wasn't on purpose) but didn't apologize and cursed me "I hate your F long black hair. I only work with bald people!"3. After they found you are not treatable, they give you a dismiss letter to knick you out.4. The resident called Kafaia and Doctor Farahani Sherman neglected my health and didn't even pick up calls(my implant was coming out from my skin) in the midnight, they didn't call me back. Kafaia texted me "not to bother my sleeping. If you die, go contact emergency number"I have lists of evidence to show how crazy this hospital is. Don't ever go there. It may save you some money, but hurt your respect, health, time and the RIGHT TO BE AN ASAIAN PERSON!(they're racist, especially the faculty Rurier on the 7th floor of root canal department)

Very disappointed. After all is said and done.. I showed up for 5 appointments after work.. drilled my teeth..had fillings done.. and 3 months later, my fillings all fell out! I have not had the chance to call them yet. But after coming home from a long day and cutting my tongue on my sharp screwed up tooth.. I'm pissed. I do not have the money or the patience to drag myself over there. Yet again. Definitely not worth it. First time.. should have went to a real dentist and charged my credit card.. do not waste ur time or money!!

First time I went here was in 2011 I had a tooth abscess & had an emergency tooth extraction done on the spot. The procedure went well was not painful & very quick. This is why I decided to return again for another tooth emergency. Today I went in, I did have to wait a long time. I arrived at 11:30AM & was done a little before 4PM. They took an xray & found the problem, I need a molar removed but they were unable to do that today & the xray showed I need a CT scan done before they schedule surgery as my molar is so close to my nerve they can't do surgery without knowing exactly what they are dealing with. The resident Jessica who I was assigned to was amazing! Very professional, kind & confident in her profession. I trusted her & felt safe & well informed. Two of her supervising doctors dropped multiple times to make sure everything was going smoothly & she was doing the examination correctly.  I did schedule to have my CT scan done with there but I have to wait until August 4th. I think everyone that works there is great, its a clean facility the waiting can be a pain in the ass but for an emergency & if you don't have dental insurance it only cost $75 & they told me the CT scan will cost me $125.

Worst place to get braces. The student I was assigned to does not know where they are standing. They constantly stop in the middle of the procedure to find the faculty orthodontist to ask questions to, and recall what the orthodontist told them to do. Then the students always cower over me to discuss other procedures they could have done. What annoys me the most is that the every visit I have different faculty orthodontists have something different to say. For example I would go this month and the faculty orthodontist would say, "Shift the teeth to the right and put power-chains" and the next month the other faculty orthodontist would say, "Why'd you shift it to the right? No, we have to shift more to the left." I'm not a lab rat for crying out loud, I want to get out of my braces as soon as possible, but how? If I discuss that each month the faculty orthodontists question their own advice to the right procedure they completely ignore me and don't consider the patient's input. Another thing, DO NOT EVEN DARE MISS ONE APPOINTMENT. I missed one appointment and called to reschedule, the people at the front desk gave me an appointment four months later. Four freaking months later. This drives me crazy. Definitely a place to avoid. The people at the front desk are rude and treat you as if you are getting this service for free. I definitely wish I would've avoided this place from the start.

This review is of myself being both: a student and a patient.As the patient:-As others have mentioned, getting a great student dentist vs a not-so-great student dentist can be a hit or miss. -Pertaining to the wait that Amy D. had mentioned, patients need to understand that as an institution, student dentists have procedures and protocols to follow. We have limited faculty (two to five per session) and over 32 students. There is going to be a wait and each step must be checked by the faculty prior to completion. -As protocols go, before any treatment is done, a completed medical chart must be filled out thoroughly which is why the first one or two visits may seem like a waste of time.-The student dentists are here to learn so it'll be rare to have one that can "do a filling" in 5 minutes unless it is a tiny lesion. As a student:-Dental school is stressful yet great. I enjoy learning and keep an open mind. First two years are mostly didactic and labs. You hone your skills as a clinician with knowledge and handskills necessary for the promotion to clinic as a third year. -The migration to clinic was like "hitting the ground running". There were many things not taught the first two years and I had to look up to the seniors for assistance. I learned very quickly and less than two months into clinic, I felt comfortable with a handful of procedures. Now the curriculum has changed where the D2s are put into clinic 1-2x a month half a year sooner. Did this extra exposure help? From my own observation as well as faculty, no. The students still didn't have a clue as to what was going on and were even more lazy. -Though I can't rate NYUCD as 5-stars because it is the only school I've attended and I have no other dental school to compare it to. The training I received here is priceless despite the high tuition fee.-The requirements are forever increasing each year to the point where I feel as if NYUCD is purposefully trying to hold back as many students as possible. We have a production quota to meet (which increases about $4000 each year). How are we suppose to provide quality dental care without feeling forced to work fast and produce for the school just to graduate on time?Overall I felt like I got a great clinical experience, I fell in love with NYC but I wouldn't pay the astronomical tuition.

I came here back in 06 to see if I needed braces. I took them off at another place. I got braces again. it can get crowded if plp decided they need their whole family there. front desk the African American guy is cool. the "Spanish" woman need to work on their tone of choice. mr.Tran is cool. jade is super cool. & my newest dentist mrs. Praelliha i loveee her patience with me. I knows I can be a b**** . try to keep your appointments. be on time because they don't play when it comes to time . I forgot my dentist name from the second floor. some people are cool; some people need to just be thankful they can afford to go to nyu. I got 4 teeth pulled. different people each time. I like that the intern from Pakistan gave me my tooth.

Emergency room is a joke, everyone will tell you something differently, and leave you sitting there a long time and i didn't get anything for my wisdom tooth pain at all. Or the extraction. Just go somewhere else for your tooth needs.

I'm glad some people have had positive experiences with this place. I'm not one of them. I went to the dental clinic because I knew I needed a lot of work done, and I was willing to have the work done at a dental school, even though I knew it would take a long time, because it would be more affordable.After 4 visits I was told by problems were beyond what a student could handle. (Oh,in the middle of all this, one toothache turned into a dead nerve root. I went back to my old private dentist for a root canal. The student said they couldn't have helped because I wasn't a patient yet.) After 6 visits over the course of two and a half months, I finally was given a treatment plan and an estimate that all the work I needed would cost $50,000 (with no option to plan for some of the work to be done first--i.e., they would only agree to a "comprehensive" plan to do everything). Not a lot of discussions of options---just a lot of "shaming" that I must have neglected my teeth. If I could afford $50,000, I wouldn't have gone to a dental school clinic. You know... if I read something like this on Yelp, I'd think the person posting it was making it up. But I'm not. $50,000. Maybe this is less expensive than a private dentist--I don't know. But there's no way. Oh, they gave me a flyer about getting financing through Chase bank for up to $12,000. Thanks a lot.

I went in for a cleaning, they are so thorough. They took my blood pressure, asked a lot of questions. My blood pressure was high so they told me to see the nurse practitioner first before I could get my teeth cleaned to get my blood pressure under control. Over all it was a great experience. They are very detail oriented,and they don't freak you out. I would recommend this place to anyone.

I went here to have some dental work done a few years ago! It took about a year for three crowns to be put on! They kept claiming they had to do the work they did. My health insurance asked them for records of the work they did and why it took so long and they refused to cooperate with them. My dental student was Jason Alster. Jason appeared really nice and overly charming and compassionate! A BIG READ FLAG for the abuser that he was! Jason found all the opportunity to be a cruel and as creepy as he could be when his attending  was not present. I was yelled at and he would smile when he saw me in pain. I confronted him and he went to the social worker and denied everything in a response email to me. Jason kept telling her how much I praised him. I had praised him in the beginning before he became cruel to me. One occasion he even gave me information about a previous patient. I never received an apology from him. I received denial and laughter in my face. Sadly this predator graduated and is now a practicing dentist. I hope that I will spread the word that he is no good and someone reading this will benefit from it. I am doing my best to protect others from harm.

Current Status : In the middle of treatment planDental Insurance : NoMade of Money : Not since I've last checkedI'll try and keep this review short and to the point. I've just arrived at work after my Deep Cleaning appointment and want to get this down while everything is still fresh in my mind. As many reviewers have said before, the main thing...well only thing that is on your side is the fact that you're paying a fraction of the price. The downsides include the fact that everything takes multiple appointments. You'll walk away with extra procedures on your dental plan than you've planned, and if you've come for something cosmetic....pssh you'll have to wait for that until they've completed all of the procedures they deem "more important".I came there for a cleaning, whitening, and veneers to close my frontal gap and the tiny gaps in between my teeth. I have a tiny cavity that many dentists have told me isn't necessary to fill (I was going to eventually get it filled). So let's take a look at my dental plan, I knew that I'd have to pay the $95 for the first appointment, expected and accepted. Granted, I knew I hadn't had a cleaning in about a year or so and needed it. But seriously....how do I go from expecting 3 procedures (possibly 4 if you include the filling) to 8 procedures?! -- A first appointment, cleaning, deep cleaning, extensive cleaning, composite filling, sealant on three teeth, extraction of all four wisdom teeth, whitening, and veneers. I mean seriously....how dirty are my teeth?! You'd think I've been eating out of trashcans!!!It's bad enough to have to fit these appointments in while working, but to have it where I have to wait for what I originally came in for until they've completed everything else is KILLING ME!!!! I already told my student dentist, if they want to add another cleaning after this, count me out! According to them, my gums may have deep pockets that need to be cleaned out, but my jean pockets tell a different story. I think a quick rant is much needed and appropriate...MY TEETH BETTER SHINE FROM TIMES SQUARE TO THE FREAKIN' STATUE OF LIBERTY WHEN I'M DONE WITH ALL OF THIS!!! THE BUM ON THE STREET BETTER COMPLIMENT THEM AND GIVE ME MONEY FOR BLESSING HIS DAY WITH MY SMILE!...ok it wasn't short, but hey...neither is my freakin' dental plan...

I hate to give such negative reviews, but I have had two spots so far and the place is extremely chaotic - like they that seems to have zero organizational systems in place. Give yourself at least 3 hours for an appt.

I've had a very good experience here, the student Dr. that was assigned to me was very friendly, she was very gentle and in my opinion has done an excellent job. The supervising Drs. are also friendly and show they care about their patients and students. The equipment is state of the art, and the facilities are well illuminated, spacious and very clean. Service is prompt and wating time is short. Overall a very good experience. I definitely recommend it.

DON'T START A "TREATMENT PLAN" HERE.A treatment plan is how they keep you returning...This place is really meant for NYU students to get subsidized dental care as well as give NYU dental students the ability to see & train upon individuals that pay enormous sums of money to "provide" a variety of real dental problems to be fixed.It's great to go to if you are an NYU student or have a dental emergency and are in dire need of a dentist in the area, but trust me: find a REAL DENTIST to look after your teeth once you've finished with your schooling at NYU!!!

*I joined Yelp just to write this review*If you're afraid of dentists, skip this place! They WILL hurt you! I went in for a broken tooth that was hurting, which they told me needed extracted (turns out they were wrong, but that's another story). So I went in for the extraction. THE VERY FIRST INJECTION hurt soooo bad! I knew something was wrong. My entire cheek started swelling up immediently. However, this did not concern them, for some reason.The tooth would not go numb AND THEY WANTED TO PULL IT ANYWAY! They kept telling me if WAS numb (like I'm stupid and I don't know what "numb" is), so I ended up leaving. The swelling in my cheek did not subside for about a week and a HUGE bruise developed that has not gone away three weeks later. It is still painful to the touch and I'm going to get it looked at by a doctor because it should have stopped hurting by now. Mind you the tooth was not extracted- they injured my cheek just with the injection. To top it all off, I have not been able to get a call back from anyone to refund my $200! I've called several times for a refund and have not received a call back. So, three weeks later I'm still walking around with an ugly bruise on my face and I'm out $200.Moral of this story: You get what you pay for. Spend the extra money to go to a real dentist. These guys are butchers.

As I had problems with a few dentists where I lived and never went back, I was told,by friends, to give NYUCD a try.......all the dentists , who worked on me, did a GREAT JOB......I needed fillings, caps , a root canal , ....the work was done professionally, I kept my appointments, a VERY friendly atmosphere, , I was always afraid of pain , they all did EXCELLENT WORK, and NO PAIN......I can actually remember the dentists names who did some of the work, Dr Mike Friccione, Dr David Jacobson, Dr Debbie Foran, I DEFINITELY will be going back for any dental work I need in the future.......I totally Recommend anyone who needs quality dental work done,to make an appointment and..to give it a try, you will be GLAD that you DID !!!!

Figured I'd give NYU dental a try after my buddy met his wife here. Pretty good service, right? I went in with a pain in a molar. It took about 2 hrs to see a student dentist. It took about an hour to take x-rays from the shared x-ray stations. I insisted the pain was from a particular molar, but they said they saw no decay, and that it was "intra-molar" or between two teeth, and that I should just deal with it. I'd go back to the the original dentist but he doesn't take my new health insurance. I'm pretty sure the old filling needs replacing. Gotta love our country's health insurance situation. I'm considering taking a trip to Taiwan where I got a wisdom tooth pulled for $60 by the Vice President's dentist, about 3 years ago. I paid $1000 for the same work in New York on the other side of my mouth, AFTER health insurance, about 10 years ago. Single payer health care would solve all this BS!

With my stellar Flexible Spending Plan, I've had laser whittening and braces done. Next step is implants. At 40 years of age, I've waited long enough to get my teeth done. So far I've had good care. The students are careful. Their work is checked up by faculty which is a good thing. You need to mind you p's and q's with the students. Don't just sit in the chair and expect stellar service. They are learning and you need to pay close attention to what they're doing, folks!Generally, I've had quite a good experience. No one has screwed up on my watch, though they did forget to put a lead apron on me once. The thing I like the most is how clean they are. Plastic coats everything. The dental plan my employer has is sub-standard to say the best. I pay out of pocket for NYU Dental and so far, it's been money well spent.

I have to begin this review by saying that I've had some really wonderful dental experiences here; a student saved a tooth a faculty member was fully prepared to jettison; another student -- an experienced dentist from another country who was attending to school to get certified in the US -- gave me a peridontal tooth cleaning so gentle that I didn't need anesthetic, it didn't hurt at all, really. A botched tooth pulling (they didn't give me anywhere near enough anesthetic; something which only became clear to me towards the end of the excruciating procedure when a faculty member finally intervened with a saw which he clearly expected to be able to use in my mouth -- when I literally shrieked aloud he gave me another shot and the rest of the operation proceeded with an only normal amount of discomfort ), however, was one of the more horrifying experiences of my life; afterwards they gave me only very cursory postoperative advice and when I called the help line the next day with a question about postoperative care I was given wildly incorrect information -- luckily a real dentist was able to help me before it became a genuine problem. I guess I would assume in a clinic staffed by students that you are taking your chances, that there is likely to be discomfort and inconvenience caused by inexperience, and that's why you pay half of what you would pay in a real office; my one star (rather than a normal mixed-review 3 or so) reflects my experience that the weaknesses of this clinic are really institutional ones; the faculty members are unlike any medical professionals I've ever encountered, they are at best aloof, at worst aggressively cursory in their attention; honestly they feel more like thugs than doctors. From hints dropped by the students my sense is that this has something to do with NYU running this institution like a money mill, and that the faculty is too stretched to begin to do a decent job. Many institutions run medical programs for profit, but that this profit comes at the expense of decent medical attention to the poor and the broke makes it seem like a more than cynical endeavor.

Not bad. It can be hit or miss, since your student dentist can be unexperienced.I feel they're more trustworthy compared to just finding a random dentist somewhere else. I've been to a dentist where she poked holes in my fillings in an effort to get me to have them replaced, and I've had others who tried to make me get crowns instead of a composite buildup.They practice conservative dentistry here, so they aren't trying to push the $$$ services. My only gripe with it is they can take forever, but it's in your best interest since you're looked over 3 times by different faculty.  If you're coming here for a cleaning, you won't get it on your first visit ($95). You're going to have to come back on a second visit for that cleaning ($70).When I came in for the cleaning, the whole waiting room area is like a zoo. So many people, students, chairs, cubicles. It was a huge mess because they schedule everyone at the same time, but dies down.This place is the place to get your teeth worked on if you have more $$ than time.  So far I've been to massage schools and dental schools. Next up, barber college?

You'd think at my ripe old age I would've finally learned to adhere to the old adage, "You get what you pay for".... but a lack of health insurance and a broken tooth left me with limited options. Besides- I figured it's NYU- how bad could it be?!Ummmmm....... The answer is pretty fucking bad.As I mentioned, I walked into NYU with a broken tooth (because of an old filling), but with no pain. I walked out of NYU last week- 5 appointments later, probably about 20 hours of time, in excruciating pain, with a temporary filling, a hole in my tooth, and in desperate need of a root canal.My last appointment was nothing short of something straight out of A Clockwork Orange. I repeatedly told the student dentist that I was not numb. Their response was "That can't be"- followed by them (I'm remaining gender neutral on purpose) continuing to drill. I flinched, I groaned, they stopped- called over an instructor (which takes 20 minutes at a time) who also repeated "That can't be, but give her another shot..." Then whispering behind my head. (I'm not stupid- I'm just in pain. When you whisper behind my head, I know you're talking about me, and you're saying something that I won't like. I learned that lesson in the 6th grade.) The dentist continued to work- no shot. More groaning, more stopping, another 20 minutes, another instructor, more "That can't be", more whispering, and foraging on again. Lather rinse repeat. At least 3 times. They attempted a root canal on me when I was not numb. Not numb. Are you getting this? N.O.T. N.U.M.B.They stopped when they hit the nerve, I bucked in the chair like a goddamn horse, tears shot out of my eyes, and I practically sucked the stupid latex dental dam down my throat with my choking sobs. I was hurriedly patched up with my -now 3rd- temporary filling, told to take some Advil, and come back next week.I'd rather walk in front of the M-9 bus than step foot in that place again.And back to the point of "You get what you pay for..."- I never got my root canal, but if I had, it still would've cost roughly $1300.I understand the need for teaching schools- and my problem is not even with the student. My problem is with the lack of attentiveness from the multiple instructors, the rushing of the students, and the unprofessional manner of dealing with the patients (I'm immune to novocaine- not a drug addict! And while we're on the topic- if I were using you for drugs, it certainly wouldn't be for novocaine! A numb tongue isn't really my idea of a good time. NO ONE is using you for your novocaine! Stop being so damn stingey!!!), and the ever malfunctioning equipment causing the patient to sit needlessly for long stretches of time with the most uncomfortable latex mouth dam I've ever experienced.I expected so much more from NYU. Perhaps they should stop buying so much real estate, and update their equipment! While they're at it- they should clean house of the sadistic staff.  Shame on you, NYU.

This is a place of last resort for people who have few options when it comes to paying for dental work ( expensive anywhere, very high in NYC).While I have had a few student dentists here who were nice enough young people, generally I could not believe the attitude of their supervisors ("faculty") who are either unbelievably pompous, crass or in some way so awful you usually cannot believe it.During one session I had a supervisor give a long talk to the student bragging about all the money he had made working on corpses from the World Trade Center. He was telliing the student what great work this was because it was so lucrative and implying the student think about it as a specialty for this reason.This is, alas, a rather typical NYC attitude not confined to this clinicThe tuition here is very high compared to other schools...they accept students who cannot get accepted at other dental schools...If you have any other way to get your teeth fixed or can somehow raise the money, do it.

Going to the emergency clinic on weekends at NYU dental school was a waste. I needed both of my lower wisdom teeth extracted as they were badly decayed, swollen and extremely painful. It's something I've been putting off for years do to a lack of funds. I first visited the clinic on Saturday, March 2, 2013. After the receptionist put me in the system she charged me $50 for the initial visit. I asked her how much extra the extractions were going to cost and she told me that it would be discussed with me when I get to back. When I got to the back they asked some general medical questions about my overall health, took my blood pressure and poked at the two teeth with some dental tool to hear me go "ah... ahh... ahhh!!!" like I didn't just say that my sh*t was already hurting. Then they told me that they didn't do extractions on weekends, to come back on Monday and to take three 200mg Motrin to control the pain :/ Before I left, I asked how much the extractions were going to cost on Monday they said that they know and that that it would be discussed with me then. I learn on my next visit that extractions cost $100 per tooth. That is all they had to say in the first place. The receptionist could have told me that they couldn't do extractions on weekends and saved me $50. I'm sure that I could have guessed that I should take over the counter pain pills without paying $50.So... I pill popped my way through an entire bottle of Motrin to make it to Monday and when I finally arrived back at the emergency dental clinic every thing that could go wrong, did. Not that I have anything against the female dental students but as I was sitting in the waiting room I was praying for a male student. That small bubble of hope was quickly burst. She took me to the back and asked the same general medical questions from before, took my blood pressure and ordered a full CAT scan of my mouth. After getting the pictures from the scan, the tools together & approval for ONLY ONE of the extractions she started by numbing the tooth with a numbing paste first. She started sicking the inside of my jaw with a 2 inch needle to numb the tooth with Novocain when the fire alarm went off. Everyone had to evacuate the building and we ended up standing in the cold on the curb for 45 minutes. After we were let back in the building there was understandably a lot of chaos for about the next 20 minutes. Once everything was settled she continued to where she left off in sticking the inside of my jaw. Soon she started poking, pulling and drilling the tooth in half. The pain factor had gone up another level because she numbed my jaw but not the tooth! I freaked so bad that I was crying with my feet were in the air and my knees clinched like I was about to pee my pants. My nerves were officially a mess and when the teacher came in I was trembling so hard that the chair was swaying with me. He touched the tooth, I freaked again and he looked at her from under his brow like B*TICH YOU FAIL but said instead you didn't numb her correctly. He sent in another teacher to finish the job and show her where she went wrong . He started off by having to stick that 2 inch needle into the center of the tooth to numb the nerve directly. I wasn't fully numb but he had to drill again because she didn't drill down far enough to split the tooth. The first half of the tooth broke off at the root as he took it out. He then took out the second a half of the tooth and then went back went back to drill some more for the broken of piece of root. Finally! The only good thing I can say about that visit is that there wasn't much pain after the Novocain wore off and there wasn't to much swelling. I returned a week later on the following Monday to get the other wisdom tooth on the opposite side extracted. This time I got a male student. I was still freaked to from my previous experience at the clinic this time was easy. He asked the same general medical questions, took my blood pressure and started the numbing process on the whole side. He had to split this tooth in half and it broke off like the last tooth but this time I didn't feel any pain at all. Only a slight pressure. He was so awesome. I was smiling from relief and I was out about 45 minute after I was called to the back. (Picture included, it looks a 10 times worse than it was.) I'd give the first visit zero stars, the second visit 1 star because at least the tooth was taken out and my last visit gets 5 stars.

Maybe i lucked out as well. I had a chipped front tooth - horizontally in half. i was extremely frantic and in tears. i called columbia and nyu and against reviewers, i went with nyu. i had a pleasant experience. From what i am reading- it seems like emergency care is the way to go at nyu. i showed up about an hour before emergency care 'begins' and it did feel like the lady i was dealing with at the desk was relieved to be leaving before it started. she was friendly, joked with me and even hooked me up with a number for a lady she knows who would be able to permanently fix my porcelain veneer at another clinic. a great start to my visiti noticed when the desk ladies 'switched over' the next worker seemed annoyed and less than happy to help anyone. i was definitely happy i had Ana to check in. the dental student i had- m.tadros, was fabulous. eric e (from a previous review) mentioned that the more complicated procedures probably had the attention of more advanced students- i agree. and after speaking with soon to be dr tadros- found out he was just a few weeks away from graduating. he was great, he helped me calm down, explained what he could do and point blank what he could not.  he was sincere and careful and genuinely a nice guy. THANK YOU!

I only give it 2 stars because the staff was friendly. You get seen on that day just to get your teeth checked up on. I could have checked up on my own teeth myself. Then you have to make another appointment just to get a filling and teeth cleaned! I'm used to going to the dentist and getting everything done on the same day!!! The dentist I had was Yosef, he was friendly on that day when he checked my teeth, but when I cancelled my appointment because I had work he said he could not see me after 2 weeks. This is crazy. I never want to go here again!!

I have visited the emergency clinic at NYU College of Dentistry twice, and words really can't describe how happy I have been with them!In 2013 I had severe pain in one of my teeth. I was (and still am) going through a rough financial patch, and really could not afford a trip to the dentist. Also I had been using the same dentist for close to fifteen years, and I had vowed to never return to him as I did not like the way I was spoken to the last time I had seen him. I'm 40 years old , not 4 - I know that I should be going to see a dentist regularly to prevent problems. My financial situation didn't allow that or I would have. Don't get confrontational and condescending towards me.I was faced with a dilemma at this point. I wouldn't go back to my former dentist, and couldn't afford to go to another dentist. I was looking around online for low cost dental care in NYC, and I was halfheartedly going to schedule an appointment with a skid row dental clinic only because of the low cost.Than I came across the NYU College of Dentistry emergency clinic. I didn't know what the cost would be, but I knew that it had to be much lower than a dentist visit. That along with the fact that no appointment was necessary sealed the deal for me. I figured that it was a better option than some hack at a skid row clinic.At the emergency clinic here, you pay $100 upfront before any work is performed.After arriving I was sitting in a dentist chair fifteen minutes later. The exam and x-ray was done, and I was given the option of an extraction or a root canal. I chose the root canal, and the student went to work.  The procedure took her longer than a dentist that has been in practice for years would have taken, but these are student dentists after all. She was extremely friendly and competent. No pain at all. And where else would you have a root canal done for $100?I visited the clinic once again just before Christmas 2013. This time I needed an extraction because the tooth in question this time was just too far gone. This tooth was a difficult extraction, and the student kept consulting with an oral surgeon about it, and the oral surgeon was present and directing him during the extraction. It was done relatively quickly, and no pain once again. If I had read some of the Yelp reviews before I had gone here, I probably would not have. I am really glad that I did not read these reviews!!!These are student dentists. They are not as fast as someone who has been doing this for years and years. However like in all occupations they need to learn by doing. I'm sure that occasionally they make mistakes - that is only natural and is to be expected. How many mistakes did you make when you first started out in your career??Soon I will be making an appointment for the general clinic as I need to have A LOT of work done in my mouth. It would probably be the cost of a Cadillac if I went to a dentist office. By going here maybe it will be the cost of a Toyota.Just know what you are in for before you go here, and you really shouldn't be too disappointed.

Terrible! Horrific! Warning stay away!!!Completely irresponsible, unskilled, and incompetent student labor and third class staff. You will regret it. You will suffer. You will need to go to a real dentist to fix their mistakes. Don't say you haven't been warned!

Mission: To get a replacement crown. First visit: 2/20Total visits so far: 10Number of visits left: 1 (supposedly)Total money spent on transportation so far: $50.00 Pros: -Cheap. I'm saving at least 400 dollars by coming here. Cons:-Multiple visits-Many students do not know what they're doing and will hurt you in the process of trying to figure it out-DisorganizedSummary: This place is cheap, but you will be required to come back again, and again, and again, and again over the course of several months. For a procedure that normally only requires 2 visits, they have made me come back 10 times and have yet to finish the procedure. God forbid you have a tighter schedule than I do, because it could take even longer for you to get a procedure completed here. The dental hygiene student who was assigned to me was very nice, but very bad. She spent 3 visits attempting to finish a cleaning. After the final portion of the cleaning, it was discovered she had been performing the wrong procedure on me the entire time (deep cleaning as opposed to standard) and I was almost charged $400 dollars for what was to be a $75 procedure. The staff figured out the error and sorted things out. It wasn't until my 3rd visit that the cleaning even began. For some reason one of the teaching staff decided I needed to be numb during the cleaning, and thus I kept getting stuck with needles again and again for cleaning that didn't actually hurt. After it was finally done, I had to repeatedly return to complete different portions of the crown-prep procedure. My favorite was when I was asked by the dental student to come in on the very same day she contacted me because she had forgotten to do a shade match for the crown. An entire trip into Manhattan solely to return to this place for 5 minutes. The dental student is nice but she barely explains anything that is happening during the visits. I am mostly told which way to turn my head, but half the time it's very difficult for me to understand her because she has an accent and speaks very faintly. Since she's a few weeks from graduating, she's hopefully more competent than other students, but she isn't the gentlest with tools. I wasn't aware that sticking the little mirror in my mouth was supposed to hurt. Overall coming here has been a big pain in the ass. There have been times when I thought paying the extra 400 is worth it, but my last experience with a dentist was pretty terrible and at least the staff here is friendly and the people aren't trying to steal every last penny from you.

Being on Medicaid and needing periodontal work...I was told that my insurance would not cover periodontal evaluation and work from most private practices. I knew going to the School of Dentistry may be hit or miss, but I decided to try it out. If anything it would help save me the 150$ that other private dental practices were charging to just evaluate my periodontal condition (god knows how MUCH periodontal treatments would cost, usually). Even a regular cleaning from a private dentist from an out of network dentist would cost at least $300!I called and they scheduled me for a consultation the next afternoon. They did tell me that the initial consultation and regular appointments would be about two hours due to protocols. Because I wouldn't be paying anything for the procedures it was a small sacrifice to make.  I went in and was seen by Amy H., and she and another dental student, along with a faculty member took xrays and medical history. They were very precise and explained the procedure as it progressed. I consequently went there 3 more times to get my teeth deep cleaned...two quadrants were even done as a volunteer to help out dental students with their licensing exams. Which was great! Upon glancing at the itemized total for services (which Medicaid DOES cover entirely), periodontal cleanings every three months would cost only 80$ even without insurance. Now THAT is a quote I can live with! Also I felt reassured when the faculty would come over and refine the student's work. I love the deep cleaning work of my current NYU dental students Amy H, Peter Lim, and Arash. Very meticulous, they were great with the anesthesia, procedure, and all had very pleasant personalities and were extremely accommodating. I also had a filling done and I did not feel any sensations from the drilling. For that I need to credit Amy H. for a job well done.The faculty and senior dentists I encountered were very thorough, they had me retake certain xrays because parts were unclear and also my primary dental student might have lost points for it. I really like 'learning' facilities where the effort is clearly given toward bettering treatment and the experience. I liked having the procedures explained to me, rather than their going to work on me right away like a typical dentist might do. I feel like after many years of experience, seasoned dentists forget that most patients do not know what is going on, and take explaining the procedure/reassuring them for granted.Incidentally, Dr. Peter Lim should be opening his practice in NJ (Jersey City) in the near future, and I wholly recommend him if you live in the area and are looking for a dentist. In the meantime both he and Amy work in the same clinic so I am glad that I get to see both of them again in the near future when I go do my followup.

I'd planned my appointment a month prior (my initial appointment was supposed to be a month before that, but I had to reschedule and the next available appointment was a whole month later).Aside from it sounding like a construction site (which is expected from all the drilling and sanding down on teeth) and the screaming/wailing/crying children, the receptionist was completely rude to both patients and (from what me and a few other patients witnessed) the students/staff. She had everyone wait around the front desk while she was busy flirting with another receptionist (he looked and sounded uncomfortable, and was obviously trying to pick up her slack). Her manner was very condescending and really made the whole experience disappointing.

Don't GO! I totally got fleeced! They took X-Rays, told me I needed a tooth extraction, and said I was done. That's it. It was fast. They did nothing...I paid the initial fee $220 (ouch) now they're telling me I owe them $280 more...why? They won't say. I've asked them to itemize exactly what would cost more than the $220 I paid which included everything...to no avail. I'm going to hire a lawyer if this keeps up. AND I just went to see a REAL dentist, who took a look at my tooth and filled it. That's all it required. I told him about what they said at NYU Dental, and he said "If it was my tooth I wouldn't pull it". Just a filling. Ugh. I think it's just bureaucracy but I wouldn't get entangled with them. Have them do unnecessary extractions...yuck.

this clinic is the worse I don' t even want to remember how unacceptable this operation was do not waste your time stay as far away from them as you can

Went with my fianc to get an emergency root canal and both of her experiences ended in excruciating pain and tears (same "dentist"). The first visit consisted of her having her cracked filling removed, and the tooth cleaned. She was anesthetized, but in the wrong damn places, so she felt the young "dentist" drilling her tooth. A senior resident had to assist the student with the anesthesia process which led to my girlfriend obtaining relief.Second visit was to achieve the root canal.. STILL not enough anesthesia!!!! My girlfriend felt every ounce of the needle(s) etching and annihilating her tooth nerve!!! We told the student that her patient was feeling things she shouldn't be but she seemed resistant of that being reality and pushed forward after a couple of anesthesia sessions which isn't enough for some people (everyone is different)!!!One more push of the needle straight into the guts of my girlfriend's exposed nerve sent her straight into tears after almost jumping out of her chair from pain!Had to throw in the towel at that point. I told the student to end everything and patch up the tooth and send us on our way. Their personnel attempted to pacify us by stating that there were still remnants of the nerve that were being removed which was why my girlfriend writhed in pain?!!!?? Fuck that, that's what anesthesia is for. And if we'd gone to a non-medicaid affiliated dentist, there'd be no way in hell she'd be expected to experience or endure pain to that degree WHILE in the chair!!!!Paid 6 hundred and change for being a partially root canaled medicaid patient. Save your money and peace of mind if you can.

Don't waste your precious time going here!!I need a dental implant for my upper tooth. My initial appointment was fine. I had to wait a little while but I didn't mind because I know it's a school. However after finally being seen by someone who appeared to be an actual doctor, I was told I would get a phone call by 1 of his students to do the actual implant. I waited and waited for a phone call from 1 of them so I could schedule my 1st appointment in a series of appointments needed for the implant to be done. After more than a week, I finally got a call but I could not understand a word she said because her accent is so thick! I called the school and politely requested another student dentist who speaks better English. No one ever called. ****Look if you want to work on people's teeth--especially if you want to give them a dental implant that will cost them thousands of dollars--you need to speak CLEAR understandable English! What an awful experience!****

NYU itself gets 3 stars, but the wonderful Dr. Norman Sorkin is the reason I can consider myself a fan.I've had general check-up, cleaning, fillings, and one extraction at NYU. Most of it was good, but you DO have to look out for yourself and be on top of things re your chart. I was charged for something I shouldn't have been and one attempt at my extraction (which, thankfully, was postponed) had the oral "surgeon" students thinking bone grafting was necessary when my consult on another floor said no. It's fair to say that you have to watch your chart wherever you go, but they could've been more attentive in both situations. Dr. Sorkin is a man of deep humility and true kindness. He is also one smart guy who clearly loves to teach AND is gifted at it. If he had a private practice, I would pay out of pocket for him. If I were a dental student, I'd be at NYU. I'm always happy to have him sign-off on whatever procedure is happening that day. If you are concerned about students working on you, know that they need to have everything approved by a faculty member, who will look at your X rays and test results WITH you...so you can ask away if you have questions. I particularly like that their faculty members are very thorough without going overboard...no extra stuff that you don't need. They also value older teachers; a VERY smart (but rather elderly) doctor in the oral surgery department took one look at my X-ray (holding it up to the light in the hallway as he was sitting in his wheelchair) and told me I was OK and didn't need to be on this floor (which was for difficult cases only). I wanted to hug him and left in amusement as his word topped all of the discussion of the younger docs who were huddled around my folder. I salute and appreciate wisdom that can only come from experience and I think NYU does, too.

In my experience, accepting treatment at the Dental Implant facility puts one in a position of what appears a VERY poorly-defined system for fees and the bills you may face without insurance can be ASTRONOMICAL!!! There is NO GUIDANCE given to the patient as far as total costs unless YOU as the patient demand it. BEWARE, they should be more transparent in fees that the patient may incur along the way!!! What kind of nonsense is it to arrive to your last session only to be told that you owe another $1000 (!!!) when you were previously told you were paid in FULL!!!This is fraudulent and a very less-than-honest business practice. That's the truth to NYU Dental Implant Clinic as I personally experienced it, so help me Gd. The financial terms MUST be well-defined and if extra unforeseen procedures are in fact needed, the Clinic should be OBLIGATED to point this out to the patient.  I was glad that the Director of the program was able to refer to my initial CONTRACT which STATED my TOTAL COST for this dental implant, thank Gd I was conscientious in getting that. Buyer beware, there must be a Professional Dental Association that oversees standards and practices for Dental Clinics, otherwise, you can count on dishonesty and greed to rear their ugly heads.

Beware stay out! I understand these are student doctors, but I'm getting treatment done on the 5th floor which is the graduate floor. That floor is the student residency, you nearly considered a professional doctor and they all work like amateurs, just like the students on the 3 floor. Trust me I know I had 5 of them on this so call "graduate floor." What they can do right is butcher your teeth! If you decide to go... well you have my condolences.

I second one of the reviews by Ms. Whitney. It is the draw of the luck. All the dental students I was assigned to was not so great, once I asked to be switch at the main office. I don't want to hurt anyone's feelings but some dental students willl probably do well but they need to work on their attitude, attention span and personality. Sometime I get a gwad awful one, one I can't comprehend the language or just busy doing something else like texting during session with his gloved hands. Or they don't care to talk to you or explain things. I try not to call them out to be a better person. Those bad ones I just want to never return or see again (you know what I have done that not return but had no heart to tell NYU administration it is because the dentist I got assigned to needs to consider a different career or work for the Army to get their act together). Worse will be the ones who just don't get it or want to change themselves-their own personal growth. How do you tell a student "YOU SUCK, get away from my money cause I do go home and google info up...and I don't care for your mannerism". But some time one is so luck and get these amazing, caring and smart personal dental candidates that you sincerely want them to pass with high marks and do well in life cause the world need those dentists. I had a great one 2 years ago but he graduated then when I went back it was another not so good one; so, I stopped going....till now. I think the one I prefer to switch to might work out and I might just stay still he graduates.

2nd time in. Better experience the 2nd time around.I have no insurance, before NYUCoD I hadn't gone in forever. 1st time was 9 months ago, June, my teeth were acting extremely sensitive, I was worried about cavity. $95 for xrays and a long time of enthuastic, probably newbie dental students xray, poking and counting my teeth over 2 days. Cleaning wasn't even included -- probably had to shell out another $70 for that. When I was told no cavities, I let it go the stress, didn't schedule a cleaning, saved my $70. They did give me a prescription for special sensitive teeth toothpaste, which I didn't use. Though I did start sometimes using over the counter sensitive teeth toothpaste, and the problem lessened. All in all, I like the student dentists, they are enthusiastic, bright young bunch with their whole future ahead of them, cheered my day.Recently I felt I should get cleaning, influenced reading some web article liking gum disease to early death. Wednesday evening I called for an appointment, the next morning, Thursday 8:30AM I was in (a big plus!). I got there late because of slow bus, and was examined and cleaned and counseled by a very nice and skilled dental student, finished at about 10AM. I was lucky (or may also been later in her clinic experience), she is from Canada and had fully trained in India, and was getting extra training at NYU. I felt her experience, scouring, scraping, picking, polishing my teeth. I felt very professionally treated, and she is pleasant and pretty (with a big diamond ring :-( ). She spent a good amount of productive time scraping down a decade worth of "calculus" on my bottom inside front teeth. Final cost $95 again -- $70 for cleaning + $25 for consultation.It is not as cheap as I wish, for 1 hour of work, considering the students are not paid, instead they pay tuition to the school. But it is worth it for peace of mind, and I left both times more than $95 happier than I went in, so it is worth the cost.She did warn me if I had waited a whole year before cleaning, I would have to get new X-Rays, and basically start step 1 all over again. So I'm a bit uncertain when I go next time, more than a year after x-rays, how I will be charged. Will I be charged for $95 xrays + $70 cleaning? If so, that's too much for my budget... I'll do a better job myself on brushing, it's cheaper.

I had a great experience today with the NYU College of Dentistry. I went into Urgent Care to fix a chipped front tooth - got there a little after 8:30, paid $100, and waited for about half an hour. The student dentist that treated me was friendly and helpful. He explained clearly what he could do, and was capable while doing it. It did take a long time - but he was very upfront about that. I hope someday to have dental insurance and be able to go to a fancy dentist - but for what I need now, which is affordable dental care - NYU College of Dentistry works for me!

This huge practice was absolutely useless when I called about the logistics of becoming a patient (steering me away and confirming the reviews of others), but I stopped by for their free screenings sponsored by ABC, which were essentially new customer initiatives masked as community outreach. That said, the place was in decent shape and everyone I dealt with was very friendly. The service was as thorough as you'd expect for such an event, and Vanessa Bikhazi, a student dentist, was quite friendly (though certainly speaking from a script with a detail or two about her actual exam of me). When I let them know I wasn't going to be making my appointment on the spot, they seemed baffled, and I had to explain twice. I did leave with some vouchers for a free exam and screening, each of which are pretty valuable even considering I have decent dental insurance (they expire right before 3 months from my next cleaning so I may schedule a quarterly exam to feel out the true practice).

This is my first review on yelp, but there is no way I can stay quiet about how bad this experience was. I wasted a whole year of my life and still the job is not done (I'm at point zero once again but worse because I wasted time and two molars are now not touching like they are supposed to, they were touching perfectly before they started working on my mouth. This means these molars are now high risk for caries as more food gets stuck in between them). If you are lucky and get a great student, you will get good dental treatment, but be aware this is not always so, there are some incompetent students among the good ones (there's no way for you to know until too late whether you have the honor student or the one barely passing the class) and the faculty don't seem to provide much damage control, actually one faculty in particular in the orthodontics dept. is the worse. I trust his student more than him. But even if you get the best student doctor ever, it won't be worth the incompetence and all the mistakes by the administration. I can't even begin to say how many mistakes were done. Just two examples to illustrate: I asked for ceramic braces and got metal braces; They did a bait and switch on me, told me I could solve a problem with braces and then backtrack after I was already in treatment, they were experimenting with me and weren't honest enough to tell me that was the case until I cornered them; if I had been told that was the case at the start and I had agreed to it that would have been one thing, but at no point when they presented the treatment plan did they mention how unlikely the desired outcome was going to be. And let's not even talk about all the anguish and time I had to spend to get the administration to fix their mistakes. Customer service and basic accounting is not something these people know of. You are basically a toy for them to play with, and if things go wrong they are not responsible. Oh and if your appt is for 9:30 they will see you like around 11, even if you arrive at 9am.This review is mainly about the orthodontics department, I had better service with the general dental clinic and oral surgery. But even with those department there were also mistakes. It's a shame for the patients and the good quality students that do exist within the general mess that is this hospital.

Like a previous reviewer said, it's a hit-or-miss. Had a so-so experience at the dental department - the student was thankfully really awesome, the prices are even better, but the procedures are extremely time consuming. During the few months I went to get all of my cavities treated, I saw several patients who were annoyed and stressed out from the wait. Overall the patients seemed pretty happy. Great if you don't have any huge issues with your teeth. The endodontics department is so-so - a lot less students working and supervisors working closely with them, so it was very comforting. I had no worries here. The orthodontic department is a completely different story. You can almost never get a hold of the office, they NEVER return your message (even though their voice mails says they will return calls), and the students and people at the front are always chit-chatting and laughing. EXTREMELY ANNOYING of their UNPROFESSIONAL BEHAVIOR every time I visit. If you're confident that you can deal with the stress and have LOTS of time to kill for the sake of saving $2000 bucks, then you will have no issues. But I warn you that the total time you spend there may eventually total to you or someone making $2000 bucks, seriously.

I have been a patient at NYU Dental School for about fourteen months due to a few dental issues. My first experience was as a walk in via urgant care.I was seen with in one hour and the issue was resloved no problem. The General Dentist Dept. has been a positve experience too. My dentist as well Great at cleanings and general six month check up.Student take your vital signs at your first visit and are generally interested in overall health.Todays student dentist are far more educated and technically advanced then most dentist in private practice and they're not working the sales pitch. Clearly NYU is a teaching Dental School and they are doing a great job.The departments are clean,organized and the staff is friendly and helpful.Prior going to NYU, I went to Columbia Dental School . NYU is more affordable, excells in quility of care,and professional dental students! I Well deserving of five stars

Three stars for affordable dental care. The initial costs aren't such a discount ($95 for initial exam, and $75 cleaning) but once you're into the system it's a much more affordable way to go than other Manhattan options. Just be prepared to wait a long time! the faculty supervision is rather cursory and there looks like only one faculty member for every approx 10 students. Sometimes you have to wait 30+minutes after a procedure is completed so the student can find a faculty member to review, but that's part of the fun of coming to a learning clinic.

I had an emergency root canal performed here, by a Dr. Alobaid. He was very professional, very kind and took plenty of time to explain to me what he was doing, why, and to tell him if there was any pain and I needed more anesthetic.  This was all after a Dr. on 57th and 6th wanted to charge me 2,000 for a root canal on one tooth. And her exam room was filthy.  The best part is, that since this was an emergency and I was in severe pain, they did the initial work for free. So, all the drilling, removal of decay and the nerves - FREE.  The facility was clean enough, and everyone around me seemed to be doing a good job of things. I do have to go back to have the rest of the work finished which will cost about $700 but that's not bad considering what everywhere else wanted, especially the dirty exam room lady. My only complaint so far is the front desk lady was rude, and I was asking for a Doctor who worked there and was referring me for treatment and she said she didn't work there. But she was actually there working that day. Some people are just allergic to their own job.

If I could give this place negative stars, I would give it lots and lots of negative stars. Even if you're in lots of pain and just want to go to the first clinic and get your tooth out, this is not the place to go. Let me tell you why.I was in a lot of pain and my regular dentist was not reachable. I came here for an emergency appointment. The inside of the building was impressive, with soothing bleached wood/frosted glass decor which looked expensive. I sat in the waiting room in excruciating pain for 30 minutes while throngs of students milled around. The waiting room was filled with people waiting, some of whom seemed to be in just as much pain as me. I heard several conversations regarding Medicare/Medicaid, and how it only cost $20 if you're on it and came to this clinic. I didn't have either, nor did I have insurance, so I paid $100 for the emergency visit (which really isn't that much).So far, so good. But things only went downhill from there. The student dentist who treated me, banged on my hurting tooth with a metal instrument several times that I yelled "ow" as loudly as I could with an open mouth. He didn't stop. Tears streamed down my face from the pain. He noticed that and was a little scared. Then a professor with a heavy Russian accent came in and took a look. He asked me what I wanted to do. I asked, what do you recommend? (Thinking they were the professionals here.) He said it could be a broken root, and they could either do an extraction or give me a prescription for painkillers and have me come back a week later, but that the painkillers may not stop the pain. What do you think I chose? I asked for them to "take it out!" Which was a reasonable choice if you thought those were your choices while under the duress of excruciating pain--and trust me, there's no pain like the pain from a toothache. They numbed the area around the tooth with local anesthesia and took well over an hour hacking at and pulling the pieces of tooth. At one point, I opened my eyes and saw both student and professor, covered in blood, and using all their strength, nearly pushing against me, to pull a piece of the tooth. I knew at that point that recovery was not going to be easy. I didn't realize that it was just the beginning.When I went home and the anesthesia wore off, I was in the most excruciating pain I had ever been in for the rest of the day. The codeine they prescribed was useless against it. My face was swollen for a week. The student dentist kept calling, and when I would ask about the swelling, he would tell me that it was normal. I had to ask him if I should use salt rinses, and he thought that was a good idea. Good thing I had my wisdom teeth extracted when I was in college so I knew a little bit about post-extraction procedures, as they gave me no instructions whatsoever. (Btw, at the wisdom tooth extraction, I was put to sleep, woke up, and barely felt any pain after--I remember I never filled the prescription for painkillers).But the pain was just the beginning of the saga. The student dentist was very excited about the next step--a bridge or an implant. His calls were to check on my progress and ask me to come in for the evaluation for the next step. However, when I finally went back in a week later, still swollen and in pain, the student dentist performed some x-rays and left the room without explanation. Several professors then came by and discussed in hushed tones outside the room. One that I had never seen before came back in to tell me that during the previous extraction, a piece of the metal instrument they used was left in my jaw. (How were they doing the extraction that would cause the metal instrument to break?) They had to go into the healing gum to dig it out. I was starting to feel like a classic tort case--res ipsa loquitur. More pain. More painkillers. The student dentist was horrified as he watched his chances of an exciting opportunity to be part of the next steps slip away. The professor dug out the metal piece and the whole room cheered. There was no way that I was ever coming back to this place again. I sucked it up and spent over $3,000 to get an implant from the best dentist in the city. I went back to my regular dentist after this episode. He told me in a saddened tone that the extraction was not necessary. The tooth could have been saved. He was sorry he was not reachable that day.   I still curse the day I wandered into this butcher shop.

Yesterday I had a dental implant put in at NYU dental school. This wasn't supposed to happen. One year ago I walked in needing nothing more than a root canal. Then I got a student that perforated one of my canals while performing the root canal. Therefore, they could no longer complete the original treatment and I had to have the tooth removed. A year and many failed appointments later, I had an implant put in. The dentists that put it in today were great but it has been a long time and I have had many, many problems so I still can't say it has been a good experience.The nice thing that NYU did was to acknowledge their mistake and they are not charging me for the work on the new plant tooth or crown. My student that replaced the original dentist that made the mistake is fantastic. My endodontics team was also great. Just be careful with certain student dentists that they give you and always plan to spend a long time at the school. Nothing is EVER fast with these student dentists.

I came here because I needed a temporary filling removed. They did everything but what I asked. I was told "we are keeping an eye on that." After some well meant but painful xrays from a very earnest student dentist, I had deep cleanings and some other treatments.....next thing you know the temp filling (and my tooth) broke...my student dentist told me the "game plan" had changed and that I needed a bridge and said that when all was said and done, it would cost about $1200. When I questioned him about why they did not address my original problem right away, he was flustered and could not give me a rational answer. Guess who's not going back to NYU Dental School!!!! Beware people.

I went to the walk in emergency clinic and was surprised by how quickly I was seen (and by how friendly the desk staff was!) Unfortunately, my surprise soon turned to unease when I was paired with a very insecure, timid dental student who in a crowded elevator began to speak about the information on my medical form. I'm pretty sure that's a violation of HIPAA, but okay...it was also just strange. Anyhow, she took an x-ray and voila, minutes later I was informed that I would be needing a root canal. Bummer. The worst part was, (even worse than finding out you need a root canal), was the condescending manner with which I was treated by the student's supervisor. Firstly, don't scold me like a child for not getting my regular cleanings. Clearly I don't have health insurance, which is why I am at this clinic in the first place. I'm sorry, I'm not a well established dentist who can afford such frivolities, I have rent to pay and food to buy. Oops! Maybe you should be scolding the ridiculous health care system we have in America. Then, as he was explaining what the procedure would be once I was transferred to the Endo Department, he stopped mid-explanation and literally said, "You don't understand what I'm telling you." Um, really? I actually DO understand what you're telling me you pompous meathead. Pompous. Meathead. I think all of the dental staff need a thorough training on how to interact and treat low-income patients with no other option. Maybe with some compassion and understanding instead of scorn?

I'm hoping it's gotten better. At least 10 years ago I went there with a dental emergency. Despite the fact that it would have been a simple permanent fix, they refused to do anything but a temporary because this was for emergencies only. They said they could only stabilize. I filled out paperwork to come back, and got an appointment for two months later! The person I spoke with said that the dentists were leaving, as it was the end of the term. Worse than that, the day before my appointment, the dentist assigned to me called to reschedule the appointment, said she was too busy. She said she could see me yet another two months down the line! I gave up, and began the search for a local dentist. By the time I finally got to see one, the tooth was past saving and had to be pulled. Now I need dental implants, and want to check out NYU Dental as opposed to continuing to save and eventually become a dental tourist. Such a mixed bag of reviews here isn't very reassuring

I got my tooth extraction done here and it was truly painless, the doctors were super friendly and the place is clean and inexpensive.

Stay away from this place; even the faculty and students will tell you off-the-record that no one should go there unless they are desperate. I was a patient for years, determined to make things work. Now I'm sorry I ever heard of the place because they wrecked my teeth and put me through hell while they did it. Prosthedontics on 4W has a unique piece of torture called a "Treatment Plan" that is mainly to get you to agree to a payment plan. They pressure you for payment while not doing the work. If you want to get out, they (supposedly) cannot figure out what your refund should be. It's a despicable, unconscionable scam.Patients' welfare comes after the students' and administration's. Students pay $60-70K per year in tuition while patients, of course, pay much less for treatment. Basically, you're a guinea pig for the students.There is very little continuity in treatment because of turnover among not only the students but also the faculty. The quality of the faculty is poor to fair with most in the "fair" category. Treatment drags on for years and years while you contend with the cost and time of many visits and temporary teeth that break and fall out. After frustration comes anger, then comes numbness (you can't believe how much suffering and disrespect you're willing to put up with). Finally, you want to leave but can't because they owe you "re-does" on teeth they've botched sometimes multiple times. It amazes me that there is anything like this hell hole posing as a legitimate concern. How do they get away with it?

My insurance stinks! I was telling a friend I need a cleaning but can't afford to pay out of pocket. She went to dental school here. She knows one of the instructors. With every cleaning I have had I am in and out. Not here because they are training, it takes months. I don't want to say anything bad about the people since a friend recommended me to a friend. I guess it is just the way it is. It is a school. I also brush my teeth obsessively and always have. I have always been a bit of a clean freak. I actually carry tooth paste, a tooth brush, and mouth wash everywhere. -(don't judge) So it seemed strange that they found cavities. It ended up that I do not have cavities at all but they filled a tooth anyway! And because the appointments keep going on and on it ends up being more expensive for what should be a simple one time appointment. I do need to find a good and ethical dentist in the NY metro area if anyone can recommend one.

Went to NYU College of Dentistry for a post and crown on my front tooth thinking it would be less expensive. NOT! It has taken almost one year for them to complete the procedure and so far it has cost nearly $3000. They are student doctors supervised by senior fellows so the service is good but each step of the way they have to photograph what they did, write a report and present it to their attending doctors and fellow students. Also, I've shown up for appointments and have waited more than an hour only to be told the doctor had overbooked her time. I left work early, lost money, to make the appointment. Insane. Trust me. Go to any dental clinic and have post and crown work done for half the cost and half the time.

I had a wonderful experience here! I received several honest opinions for my treatment and the students and instructors went out of their way to make me feel comfortable.

If you have more money than time, the NYU COD is the place to go for decent dental care. If you are a full or part-time student anywhere in the city (or are willing to say that you are) you can get on the stu-dent plan for $225 for the entire year, which covers all cleanings, fillings, etc--and other procedures are heavily discounted if you need them.Appointments take a long time because the student dentists are closely monitored by professors and need sign-off on each part of the procedure. You will need to go back a number of times to execute your entire treatment plan, but you will likely save thousands of dollars. If you've been away from the dentist for a few years (like ten or twenty) this is an amazing opportunity to get your mouth in shape for pennies on the dollar.The student dentists are all competant and thorough and the professors also sit down with you to discuss your treatment. The ideal patient is one who has a flexible schedule and can afford to come back for several visits. Bring a book and/or an iPod and you'll be fine. As long as you know what you're getting into, you'll be very impressed that this place exists.

My student dentist was amazing. Very knowledgeable, easy to talk to, and thorough. I went to the school because another dentist had told me I needed a couple of fillings and was going to charge me $200 each. That I could not afford, and found out that fillings are only $25 or so at the school. After several people looking in my mouth and at the x-rays, it turned out I didn't even need fillings.However, despite my positive experience while receiving treatment, it is the most irritating and angering experience to try to get the paperwork needed for reimbursement from your insurance company. I hate calling the number for the dentist switchboard because you have to listen to all these directions and '0' doesn't just take you to an operator. Nobody can help you and will transfer you (or instead hang up on you). Oh, and who has the time to travel to the dentist office just to get paperwork signed. Why can't they just fax it to me!!!! I do not like this very much.

This is not "Eek! Methinks not!" this is "Looking for a personal injury lawyer". Yeah, it's a school....but the STAFF actually refused to give me pain meds after any of the three sessions it took to do a root canal on me.A ROOT CANAL.And yes, I was in a lot of pain, which they (the student and then the staff) refused to believe. The comment I got, repeatedly, was "We removed the root; you shouldn't be in any pain." MEANWHILE, I F***ING WELL WAS.What they missed was part of my root, according to the next dentist I saw, but as it happens, *that* dentist (at American Dental Arts) has the worst collective reviews of anybody in Manhattan....I'm so lucky....) but I actually had a major argument with the "patient advocate" and the director of the school after my final root canal procedure; I was in so much pain, my *eye* hurt. They refused to give me any pain meds at all, and when I tried to extract an explanation from them, I got Vulcan. (Yes, the pun was intentional, and no, I don't speak Vulcan.) Somehow, "in that environment", they are "unable" to give pain medication. I finally said "In what environment, exactly? Because here, on Earth, people *do* manage pain. And if I go out the door and down the street to Belleview's ER, they'll give me some, and btw, they'll laugh at you. They'll take one look at my tooth and I promise you, they'll laugh." Which is exactly what happened. I didn't ask for more than a couple of pain meds, but I was damned if I was going to go home and suffer, the way I did on the night of the first procedure. I posted about it vociferously on FB, too. So one of my FB friends, a lawyer, gave me some good advice, including that I should e-mail the head of the University. I did, and he never replied. So.....PAIN AND SUFFERING, ANYBODY???Do NOT EVER go there.

Maybe I just got lucky...I was surprised to see all of the negative reviews but my student dentist was very thorough and efficient. Yes, every appointment takes about 2 hrs but if you don't have dental insurance it's a small price to pay. The staff was courteous and compassionate. It basically takes three visits before they are able to treat you but you will be paying far less than you would at any other Manhattan facility.

Sigh. Everything takes a lot longer, but you are helping people learn and it's super affordable. I've had a few funny experiences there, like laying back in the chair underneath a speaker that kept yelling doctors' names while overhearing the buzz of various dental tools and a screaming woman. Have to say that (so far at least) they have got the job done. Like I said, you just have to be patient because everything takes double-quadruple the time.

Jesus H. I love it here. I was used to fly-by-the-seat-of-their-pants dentists who take .5 seconds to look at my teeth, give me a bag of toothpaste, and send me on my way. This was the most comprehensive tooth cleaning I've ever had in my entire life. Obviously, because it's a college, but, my student dentist, Dr. Kapoor, was so thorough and caring. He's the best. If you don't have insurance, or if you have Medicaid, go here. There was a supervisor/dentist/teacher who was kind of a smartass and scheduled me for sealants when I don't think I need them but, whatever. I probably would need them down the road. They don't eff around when it comes to teeth and I really appreciate that.

I love Mary Kim. If she is your dentist, you are ridiculously lucky. She is so nice, professional, and really committed to doing the best job ever on your teeth! My teeth seriously look BEAUTIFUL after she cleaned them! I was going to get Zoom whitening, but now they look so good I don't even need it!! As for the facility itself, it is very clean, very professional, and pretty quick. You may need a couple visits before you can get your teeth cleaned, but it's so worth it. Remember these people are students so it's a learning process. There will be teachers and other students who poke their heads in from time to time. However, I would rather go here and be treated by people who are motivated by getting it right and bettering their education than go somewhere where their motivation might be making money. I love this place! Go here, get your teeth pretty, and smile more!!

I like this place alot, ive had 2 students so far, both were very nice and professional, i never have to wait, and they call to remind me of my appts, they've been patient and gentle while working on my teeth...i have no complaint as of yet lol knock on wood....only thing that could change is the cleanliness of the 1st floor restroom! that is disgusting....

The 1 star is for the great price ($100) to remove an infected wisdom tooth. The reason I rate these guys so low is because when I went in there to meet my student doctor he showed me to the room, was very friendly and explained everything to me. Except he kept contradicting himself. It was like every 5 minutes another student would come in and say "NO IT DOESNT MEAN THAT, YOUR DOING IT WRONG" or something along those lines which seemed very odd to me. But my nice student dentist would simply tell me "im sorry what I told you before was not the case". Anyway lets skip over to the procedure. Suddenly I see a new student I have never seen before and I'm told this is the oral surgeon. They go to work right away. I'm in a lot of pain, they keep asking me "pain or pressure" and I say I dont know what the difference is so I get yelled at "YOU HAVE TO KNOW" my worst nightmare has begun. I kept saying pain and they kept going, i kept raising my left hand and they kept going. Now I know what torture feels like. Towards the end I had complications and they had to cut / drill my tooth. Shit. So they go to work first the surgeon cutting away and I can only imagine what a bloody mess my gums look like at this point. Then the incompetent but nice student doctor says "let me try give me the knife" kill me now. So he gets to hack at my gums too. When its all said and done I leave thinking ok thats it. I'm still mostly numb from the procedure and I ask if I can return to work, and they all say "yeah shouldnt be a problem once it wears off just take the vicodin and it will be seamless". I went to work and the anesthesia wore off, vicodin kicked in. It was not seamless. I immediately felt a sharp hard pain in the area, Rushed home, Iced it, cried, and now I'm on day 3. Although the pain has gotten more manageable, this confirms why I never want to go to the dentist. They lie to you, they hurt you, and I just dont think its right to be drilling into someones body and hurting them so badly. There has to be another way.

I recently lost my dental insurance and needed to see someone for some pain that I was having. I found NYUCD and thought I'd give them a try, even though the reviews are mixed.I went to the urgent care center on a Friday afternoon. I was pleasantly surprised! The waiting area was modern and very clean. Front desk staff were nice. Yes, the student dentist took awhile to do some things, but the expert faculty dentist did some of the work himself because he knew I had been there for awhile (1 hour) and was in some pain. He was incredible and quite a funny guy too!It was a great experience. I left with my cavity addressed and more $ in my account than if I would have gone to a private practice dentist. (I paid $100.). I highly recommend!

I personally have complex dental procedures which require multiple specialties. the work is good but it is very time consuming since I tend to have student dentists who are doing their post graduate work and subject to availability of their academic calendar. For the basic cleaning, cavities and overall basic maintenance, I recommend a generalist which require less time but for specialization, the work is good.

My experience here was dreadful. To be fair, I have known some people who have had good experiences, but they were for more complicated procedures that probably had the attention of more advanced students and instructors.  I came here for a general check up and cleaning--my initial visit was uneventful, as they found two cavities and made an appointment with me to come back and have the first cavity filled. This appointment was out of a nightmare. First, my student insisted that I needed a mercury amalgam filling. When I expressed concerns about mercury and a desire in fact for a composite filling instead, she very forcefully insisted on my having the metal filling. Only when her instructor corrected her that a metal filling was not necessary for my type of cavity did she go ahead and start the composite: which she got all over my teeth and spent the next HOUR with me in the chair trying to get it off! She used some sort of a drill to start grinding it off, to the point where I started to fear my enamel was being damaged. She got more and more distressed as it got later in the afternoon, as she said to her student assistant that the instructors would be going home soon and be unable to evaluate her work. She started grinding away in more and more of a hurried fashion until I got up and insisted that she not rush, that this was my teeth she was dealing with. She denied she was rushing, and ended up wrapping up my visit with chunks of composite still stuck to some of my teeth other than the one with the cavity. She then discussed a visit for my second cavity: she said that her next test was FOUR MONTHS AWAY and would wait to give me the second filling then.Of course, it didn't matter at this point anyway: I will never set foot in this place again. Maybe you'll get good dental work, and maybe you won't. I've learned my lesson regarding a penny saved, a pound foolish.

STAY AWAY if you need a lot of dental work. My wife is a mess because of this place. Over a two year period she only had one out of three crowns put in and that one (made in China) broke after a couple of weeks!Her upper sinus was punctured and took months to get better.The "supervisors" are a joke. They should retire. The students are all foreign. I wouldn't mind but you can't communicate with them as their English is so bad.It takes months just to finish one tooth because of how they schedule.She stopped going last year after becoming pregnant. Yesterday she had to have the tooth with the broken crown pulled. The dentist who worked on her (not related to the school) asked who did such a poor job in her mouth. Roots were not completely cleaned. Sloppy work.In the end, all the work done was a waste of money and caused more damage then if she did nothing.The school needs a complete overhaul. It's a disaster.......

I just went today for the first time...truly not a bad experience at all, but like some other reviewers, I may be one of the lucky ones.The NYU school really has made it affordable for people without dental insurance to get treatment. The visit itself is quite long, but the students are very thorough and the professors check on their work as the procedure progresses.I arrived at the Emergency Care unit, without an appointment, and was treated within 15 fifteen minutes. I had chipped my front tooth, the students took great care of me, and my tooth is as good as new!! I don't know how long it will last, but for $100, it was all well-worth it.I plan on coming back and I would recommend this place to anyone without dental insurance.

Worst experience ever. So unorganized, So cold, no bedside manner at all. People go to healthcare professionals because they're in need and when they're treated with disregard it only makes them feel worse. The doctors at NYU Dental clinic should be ashamed of themselves.

The problem with a place like this is it seems to depend a whole lot on what faculty member and student you end up with. In any case, maybe I just got lucky twice because I had a great experience for both of my encounters. If you haven't been there before, it can be quite an ordeal to get to what you came in for in the first place (unless what you're looking for is a cleaning). Getting the 'treatment plan' requires going through the general dentistry students, who then give you a referral (eventually) to the department you really need. I went in to get grafting for gum recession and it took about two months from the time I first saw the hygienist until I was walking out with an ice pack on my chin. It was a little touch and go during the actual procedure; I was kind of nervous about letting someone with minimal experience wander around in my mouth with a blade, and then it didn't help that I could hear discussion about them not being sure which side was up on the flap of skin they were supposed to be sewing onto my gums. But in the end they figured it out and they did a great job. The student was personable and patient with all my questions. They had even originally told me that it would cost almost a thousand bucks (which is still cheap for perio work, somehow), with two different procedures. But when I went back after a few months for them to check up on the first stage, they said it went so well that the second procedure wasn't necessary, and it only cost me a little more than half of what it was supposed to be. A certifiable dental bargain.  I agree about the first floor restroom, though. I've been to a number of bars with way cleaner bathrooms, which is pretty appalling in general, and especially for a healthcare facility.

I would give this place negative stars if I could. The biggest culprits: the Endo department. Two separate root canals, different years, both failures. I am right now $5000 down, and half the job is done. (Not that it's that easy to find "a real dentist"/in my case - oral surgeon.)one root canal, mysteriously infected; nobody would tell me why because it was crowned, and he /they couldn't see. I would also postulate that the minute any other dentists hear NYU dental school, they figuratively flee in terror, afraid of making any kind of statement.The other (student in the Endo Department), the guy could not find my roots, so he drilled indiscriminately, searching around, so there was no tooth left. He also buzzed my mouth, drawing blood, creating a scar that I would bite every three weeks for the next couple of months. I wrote the Endo Department about that.The regular students, meh. For cleanings, yeah, lots of time, most of the time they don't feel very proficient; but the professors overseeing them is good. Even though they missed an infection that a "real" endodontist found, immediately.AVOID THE ENDO DEPARTMENT LIKE THE PLAGUE

Been to the school several times. Once visit one of the supervising dentists told me that there was a conspiracy against Osama Bin Ladin. I was in the chair he had a sharp tool in his hand so I didnt say anything...but what kind of supervising people do they have.Last visit the supervising dentist explained to the student that there is a better technology for making caps but even though the new tech was invented at NYU they didn't use it...Again,what is going on.I am discontinuing my patronage and going to Columbia. Now to get my credit balance back. I agree with the other reviewer..the reception staff is rude.

I had extensive work on my teeth done here and I am completely unsatisfied. The school is run by some of the most irresponsible teaching staff I have ever encountered. The students were in a rush on every visit and were far more interested in filling holes than doing a good job. In fact the fillings were so bad that I need root canals, that I wouldn't have needed otherwise. Stay away from these quacks at all costs and for god's sake learn from my mistake and go to a professional.

I will curse these bastards for the rest of my life.

I went in because i have no insurance and needed work done, aside from a couple cavaties Ii had to get an old filling repaced becase it was letting food get stuck, they drilled and driled and kept drilling and then decided it needed a crown. So i get the crown because what else can i do, (temporary crown fell out twice- and once i bit it and it cracked another tooth) the crown seems ok, (torture to get done btw) fast forward about a year later, i go to a regular dentist because the crown was bothering me, he says that they didnt make it dry when they put the crown on and it rot underneath, and the crown is actually loose and my dentist just give it a tug and it pops off. Now i have to get the remaining tooth pulled and need an implant that i have no way of affording. Also I had another filling done and she put it in and said it looked great and then i realized that i couldnt even bite down on that side because the filling stuck up too much, i went in a couple days later and asked if it could be fixed and had to argue because she said it looked fine, and wouldnt listen when i said it felt like i had a rock on my tooth and could barley eat, before she would fix it. So it might be more expensive but do not go here for more then a cleaning, its like playing russian roulette, and will probably cost you more in the long run.

hmm...where do i begin.i was told by a friend(who had a root canal done) about this place who said it was cheaper than a dentist. she said she saved a bunch of money, and they did a good job, but in order for me to get a cleaning, it would take two visits. so, i was prepared for that, my 1st visit was info and xrays, and i was told that i wouldn't get a cleaning till my 3rd visit. WHAT??! 3 visits for a cleaning = bullshit. well, she ended up doing the cleaning in the 2nd visit afterall. she said she found 3 very small cavities, but it would require multiple visits to fill them. ugh, really?! i guess i just got fed up. so, i called 1.800.dentist for one in my neighborhood(which is what i should've done to begin with. i ended up paying 95.00 for 1st visit, then 70.00 for cleaning...and probably would've paid less at a dentist! the clinic wants to charge me 330.00 for 3 composite fillings. seems like a lot for a clinic, and that's also why i'm switching, besides the lengthy future visits. i really wanted to help in participate for the students, but it seems to have gotten ridiculous. maybe if i needed a major job like a root canal, it'd be worth it? i also don't like the fact that i had to pay for my xrays to bring to another dentist. that also = bullshit, btw. any of my past dentists never charged me for that when i moved and needed my xrays to be transfered. the office is a complete zoo and i waited forever for them just to sign a release paper and pay. and to top it off...i couldn't even get my xrays that day! ha! they said to call back in 5-7 days so i could get them then. what the hell???!!! hahahahahahaha...this place made me lose my mind.

My experience at NYU dental was very poor. I went there after having a temporary cap put in by my previous dentist which caused discomfort . As a Registered Nurse I expected better service from NYU. Instead I dealt with a student dentist who was rude, unprofessional, would not explain whatever procedures he wanted to do and seemed bothered by my asking questions.(he was aware I was an RN). I finally walked off his chair when his response to one of my questions was "if I explained that to you it would be like talking to myself"....?? It was then I knew it was time to walk away. His last words to me as i walked out of his area were "it would be best for all if you DID leave" He obviously realized I would not stand to be his guinea pig. My advice to others is whenever any health care provider avoids answering any questions regarding your health walk away immediately. You certainly would not want your life in their hands! You are better off spending your money on a REAL DENTIST!

Hi, Save yourself and your teeth.Don't waste your time going to this school. I had to go to 3 appts to do the general exam and 2 appts to do the periodontist exam. the people were nice but your just a guinea pig in this mess of bureaucracy. the care is poor and not cheap with all their extras. my mouth hurt for days from the exam.do yourself a favor. join a discounted dental program. the rates were cheaper than nyu. i joined dentalprograms.com for aetna dental access. i get aetna dentists at the aetna fee schedule for a $100 for 15 months. my regular dentist belongs to it.good luck and stay away from nyu dental.

This was truly the worst experience of my life. I have had several bad experiences with dentists and admittedly I am very gun shy. I recently went to 3 different dentists and got 3 completely different treatment plans. Anything ranging from a couple of root canals to periodontal; treatments to pulling a couple of teeth. I just got the feeling that money was a motivating factor for all of the work they said that I needed. Since I was hearing conflicting stories I though I would go to NYU Dental school as I thought that they would not be motivated by money. I told them of the fear I have of dentist and thought they understood. They told me that I would have to have 6 teeth pulled and inplants put in. The cost was a lot less than other inplants and I thought they were telling me the truth. One tooth I had to have pulled because it became very painful. I then made an appointment to have 4 teeth removed. i told them that I needed to be put under, but they would not. I think that 4 teeth being pulled is something that people should be put under for. When I got their they gave me Novocain and laughing gas, which I requested. When they started to do the work the gas stopped working. It took the technician 30 minutes and it turned out that the entire floor was out of gas. There were 2 professors and 2 students. They asked if I would still like to go ahead without the gas and after a while I said, let's do it. He started cutting my gums and I told him I could feel it. They gave me more Novocain and tried again. It still hurt. They then gave me a nerve blocker and started again. I was in pure agony the entire time I was there. The student trying to pull the tooth was not doing a very good job and I could hear the professor trying to direct him. They then got out something and started sawing my tooth. The technician could see that I was not doing well and held my hand. As soon as she did she told the dentists that they had to stop as I was going into SHOCK!!!! I didn't do anything for a couple of months and in the meantime where they had started to saw the tooth, a big chip became loose and I almost swallowed it while eating. I recently went to a new dentist and I do need to have some work done, but only 1 tooth needs to be pulled. He said he doesn't understand why they wanted to pull all of those teeth as they could last me 5, 10 or more years each. I think at NYU Dental School they want to do as many procedures as possible so the students get the experience. I think that is deplorable. I truly urge people not to even think about going there. I know it is cheaper, but in the end you may be paying more because you are having work done that you don't need.

I had extensive work to be done and have no insurance, so I was paying out of pocket. While it is less expensive than a Manhattan doctor would pay, it still isn't exactly cheap. I paid up to almost $200 for some fillings. And I was often tortured - I felt like Dustin Hoffman in Marathon Man. My student dentist was really, really nice and probably as good as a student dentist can be, but I had a lot of problems with pain and he didn't address it properly until I finally insisted upon talking to a teacher. Why don't the teaching staff make absolutely certain that the students know how to properly administer anesthesia, give the correct amount and check to see if the patient is properly frozen? It got to a point where I was seriously afraid to go in. One would think that would be the FiRST thing they would teach them. Are they sadists?! They are other fundamental things that my student didn't seem aware of either, like - don't put me practically upside down in the chair so that I almost drown from the water you are flooding my mouth with - that sort of thing. So I think it's pretty bad you have to pay to be tortured! If it was free, or really cheap - maybe I would just grin and bear it. But when you are paying thousands of dollars for a STUDENT to torture you, that's not right. Also - the teachers don't check up very often. They may come by once at the end of a procedure, but I think they should come by more often and check as the procedure is being done. They should also consult with the patients every so often - especially when someone is getting a lot of work done - to see how it's going and get feedback, or pop by at the beginning of an appt. to see if the patient has any concerns. It's hard to ask your student to get the teacher because you don't want to get them in trouble or whatever, but you shouldn't have to - the teachers should definitely be more available and hands-on. If they were there to hear minor concerns early on, that might avoid big concerns later on, when the issue is so bad or so obvious it can't be ignored. There were other problems too, but in the end I would just say - if you can afford it AT ALL, do NOT go here. Go to a real dentist. You won't save that much money going here - in fact, I think it's a bit of a rip-off. (We're the guinea pigs, why should we pay? Other dental schools elsewhere don't charge!) I n any case the reductions are not enough to warrant the hell you'll go through. Seriously.

